Arkansas, session 2025, HB1130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 1, Subchapter 5, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-1-506. Housing improvement zones.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Housing improvement zone" means an area of land designated
by the local governing body within the corporate limits for residential unit
improvement projects;
(2) "Home inspection" means the same as defined in § 17-52-303;
(3) "Home inspector" means the same as defined in § 17-52-303;
and
(4) "Residential unit" means the same as defined in § 17-52-303.
(b) A local governing body may designate housing improvement zones.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section,
*SSS064*
01/14/2025 10:44:51 AM SSS064

HB1130
property located in a housing improvement zone created under this section is
exempt from all permits related to the development of a residential unit
improvement project within the jurisdiction of the local government or the
state.
(d) Property located in a housing improvement zone shall pass a home
inspection administered by a home inspector upon completion of the
residential unit improvement project.





























01/14/2025 10:44:51 AM SSS064